Illinois, session 104th, HB1847.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Garden Act is amended by changing Sections 515 and 25 as follows: 6    (505 ILCS 87/15)7    Sec. 15. Right to cultivate vegetable gardens. 8Notwithstanding any other law, any person may cultivate 9vegetable gardens on their own property, or on the private 10property of another with the permission of the owner, in any 11county, municipality, or other political subdivision of this 12state. A person may save the seeds grown in a vegetable garden 13for personal use or non-commercial sharing. 14(Source: P.A. 102-180, eff. 1-1-22.) 15    (505 ILCS 87/25)16    Sec. 25. State and local regulation still permitted. 17Section 20 of this Act notwithstanding, this Act does not 18preclude the adoption of a regulation or local ordinance of 19general nature that does not specifically regulate vegetable 20gardens, including, but not limited to, regulations and 21ordinances relating to height, setback, water use, fertilizer 22use, or control of invasive or unlawful species, provided that   HB1847- 2 -LRB104 06464 BDA 16500 b1any such regulation or ordinance does not have the effect of 2precluding vegetable gardens or saving seeds grown in 3vegetable gardens.4(Source: P.A. 102-180, eff. 1-1-22.)